District of Columbia statutes.
29-1001.06

Governing law.

The law of the District shall govern the:

(1)

Internal affairs of a limited cooperative association; and

(2)

Liability of a member as member and a director as director for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a limited cooperative association.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 107 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.